Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-511
District funds; where deposited; how disbursed; annual report.

All donations, contributions, bequests, annuities, or borrowed money received by or on behalf of the district shall be deposited with the secretary-treasurer of the district and shall be drawn out only upon proper check. Such check shall be authorized by the board of directors and shall bear the signature of the secretary-treasurer and the countersignature of the president of such district. The secretary-treasurer of the district shall, at each annual public meeting of the district, present a financial report concerning the affairs of the district.

Laws 1939, c. 38, § 7, p. 193;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 35-607;

R.S.1943, § 35-407;

Laws 1949, c. 98, § 11, p. 267;

Laws 1993, LB 516, § 3;

Laws 1998, LB 1120, § 14.